District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2203

Duties and powers of Board.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-172, § 4, 33 DCR 7211
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1232, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3403.